src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-pimisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimisin - ok : # Ordinary VAIn

  
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nipimisinin # INDEPENDENT
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    pimisin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg+Dial:    pimisiniw
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: pimisiniyiwa
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nipimisininân
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl:   [kipimisininaw, kipimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kipimisininâwâw
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    pimisinwak
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl+Dial:    pimisiniwak
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X:      [pimisininâniwan, pimisininâniwiw]

     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-pimisiniyân # CONJUNCT
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-pimisiniyan
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-pimisihk
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg+Dial:    ê-pimisinit
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-pimisiniyit
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-pimisiniyâhk
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl:   ê-pimisiniyahk
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-pimisiniyêk
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-pimisihkik
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl+Dial:    ê-pimisinicik
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X:      [ê-pimisinihk, ê-pimisininâniwahk, ê-pimisininâniwik]

     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nikî-pimisinin # PRT INDEPENDENT
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kikî-pimisinin
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    kî-pimisin
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg+Dial:    kî-pimisiniw
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-pimisiniyiwa
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nikî-pimisininân
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl:   [kikî-pimisininaw, kikî-pimisininânaw]
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kikî-pimisininâwâw
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    kî-pimisinwak
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl+Dial:    kî-pimisiniwak
     PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X:      [kî-pimisininâniwan, kî-pimisininâniwiw]

     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-kî-pimisiniyân # PRT CONJUNCT
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-kî-pimisiniyan
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-kî-pimisihk
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg+Dial:    ê-kî-pimisinit
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-pimisiniyit
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-kî-pimisiniyâhk
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl:   ê-kî-pimisiniyahk
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-kî-pimisiniyêk
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-kî-pimisihkik
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl+Dial:    ê-kî-pimisinicik
     PV/e+PV/ki+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X:      [ê-kî-pimisinihk, ê-kî-pimisininâniwahk, ê-kî-pimisininâniwik]


     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    niwî-pimisinin # FUT INT INDEPENDENT
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kiwî-pimisinin
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    wî-pimisin
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg+Dial:    wî-pimisiniw
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-pimisiniyiwa
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    niwî-pimisininân
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl:   [kiwî-pimisininaw, kiwî-pimisininânaw]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kiwî-pimisininâwâw
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    wî-pimisinwak
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl+Dial:    wî-pimisiniwak
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X:      [wî-pimisininâniwan, wî-pimisininâniwiw]

     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-wî-pimisiniyân # FUT INT CONJUNCT
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-wî-pimisiniyan
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-wî-pimisihk
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg+Dial:    ê-wî-pimisinit
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-pimisiniyit
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-wî-pimisiniyâhk
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl:   ê-wî-pimisiniyahk
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-wî-pimisiniyêk
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-wî-pimisihkik
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl+Dial:    ê-wî-pimisinicik
     PV/e+PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+X:      [ê-wî-pimisinihk, ê-wî-pimisininâniwahk, ê-wî-pimisininâniwik]

     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nika-pimisinin # FUT DEF INDEPENDENT
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kika-pimisinin
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    ka-pimisin
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Sg+Dial:    ka-pimisiniw
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-pimisiniyiwa
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nika-pimisininân
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+12Pl:   [kika-pimisininaw, kika-pimisininânaw]
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kika-pimisininâwâw
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    ka-pimisinwak
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+3Pl+Dial:    ka-pimisiniwak
     PV/ka+pimisin+V+AI+Ind+X:      [ka-pimisininâniwan, ka-pimisininâniwiw]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg:    pimisiniyâni # FUNT COND
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg:    pimisiniyani
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg:    [pimisinici, pimisihki]
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: pimisiniyici
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl:    pimisiniyâhki
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl:   [pimisiniyahki, pimisiniyahko]
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl:    pimisiniyêko
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl:    [pimisinitwâwi, pimisihkwâwi]

     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg:  pimisini # IMPERATIVE
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: pimisinitân
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl:  pimisinik


     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimâw] # com SET I
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâw]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimânân]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimânaw]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwâw]
     
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimâwak] # com SET I-Pl
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwak]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimânânak]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimânawak]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwâwak]

     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimin] # com SET II
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminân]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminâwâw]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminân]


     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-pimisinimêw] # com SET III
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-pimisinimêwak]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-pimisinimêyiwa]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-pimisinimimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-pimisinimimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwa] # com SET IV
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwa]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-pimisinimimânâna]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimânawa]
     PV/wi+pimisin+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwâwa]
    
     

     
